Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-643
District; funds; how expended; bond, when required.

(1) Money of the district shall be paid out or expended only upon the authorization or approval of the board of directors by specific agreement, a written contract, or by a resolution. All money of the district shall be paid out or expended only by check, draft, warrant, or other instrument in writing, signed by the treasurer, assistant treasurer, or such other officer, employee, or agent of the district as shall be authorized by the treasurer to sign in his or her behalf; Provided, such authorization shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of the district.

(2) Money of the district paid out or expended shall be examined by the board of directors at a regular meeting within two months following such expenditure.

(3) In the event that the treasurer's bond shall not expressly insure the district against loss resulting from the fraudulent, illegal, negligent, or otherwise wrongful or unauthorized acts or conduct by or on the part of any and every person authorized to sign checks, drafts, warrants, or other instruments in writing, there shall be procured and filed with the secretary of the district, together with the written authorization filed with the secretary of the board, a surety bond, effective for protection against such loss, in such form and penal amount and with such corporate surety as shall be approved in writing by the signed endorsement thereon of any two officers of the district other than the treasurer. The secretary shall report to the board at each meeting any such bonds filed, or any change in the status of any such bonds, since the last previous meeting of the board.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 11, p. 353;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-711;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 5, p. 525;

R.S.1943, § 70-643;

Laws 1981, LB 34, § 6.